Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2103YC (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 423H.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âCredit cardâ means a card, plate, coupon book, or other 4 credit device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, 5 property, labor, or services on credit. 6 2. âDebit cardâ means a card, or other payment code or 7 device, issued or approved for use through a payment card 8 network to debit an asset account, regardless of the purpose 9 for which the account is established, whether authorization is 10 based on signature, personal identification number, or other 11 means. âDebit cardâ includes a general-use prepaid card, as 12 defined in 15 U.S.C. Â§1693l-1. âDebit cardâ does not include 13 paper checks. 14 3. âElectronic payment transactionâ means a transaction 15 in which a person uses a debit card, credit card, or other 16 payment code or device, issued or approved through a payment 17 card network to debit a deposit account or use a line of 18 credit, whether authorization is based on a signature, personal 19 identification number, or other means. 20 4. âInterchange feeâ means a fee established, charged, 21 or received by a payment card network for the purpose of 22 compensating the issuer for its involvement in an electronic 23 payment transaction. 24 5. âIssuerâ means a person issuing a debit card or credit 25 card, or the agent of such a person. 26 6. âPayment card networkâ means an entity that meets all of 27 the following: 28 a. Directly, or through licensed members, processors, 29 or agents, provide proprietary services, infrastructure, and 30 software that routes information and data to conduct credit 31 card or debit card transaction authorization, clearance, or 32 settlement. 33 b. A seller uses, as a form of payment, a brand of credit 34 card or debit card, or other device that may be used to carry 35 -1- LSB 2103YC (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ out credit or debit transactions. 1 7. âSaleâ includes leases or rentals. 2 8. âSellerâ means any person making sales of items or 3 services subject to tax. 4 9. âSettlementâ means the transfer of funds from the 5 account of a customer to a seller upon electronic submission of 6 finalized sales transactions to the payment card network. 7 10. âTaxâ means sales and use taxes under chapter 423, 8 hotel and motel taxes under chapter 423A, local option taxes 9 under chapter 423B, automobile rental taxes under chapter 423C, 10 equipment taxes under chapter 423D, water service taxes under 11 chapter 423G, excise taxes on fuel under sections 452A.3 and 12 452A.41, and cigarette and tobacco taxes under chapter 453A. 13 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 423H.2 Exclusion of interchange fee 14 upon tax. 15 The amount of tax calculated as a percentage of an electronic 16 payment transaction amount and listed separately on the payment 17 invoice or other demand for payment shall be excluded from 18 the amount on which an interchange fee is charged for the 19 electronic payment transaction. 20 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 423H.3 Payment card network 21 requirements. 22 1. a. A payment card network shall deduct the amount of 23 any tax imposed from the calculation of an interchange fee 24 specific to each form or type of electronic payment transaction 25 at the time of settlement, or shall rebate the amount of an 26 interchange fee proportionate to the amount attributable to the 27 amount of tax. 28 b. A deduction or rebate must occur pursuant to this 29 subsection at the time of settlement when the seller is able to 30 capture and transmit the tax amount relevant to the sale at the 31 time of sale as part of the transaction finalization. 32 2. If a seller is unable to capture and transmit tax 33 or amounts relevant to the sale at the time of the sale, 34 the payment card network shall accept proof of tax amounts 35 -2- LSB 2103YC (3) 91 jm/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ collected on the sale subject to the interchange fee upon 1 submission of the sales data by the seller and promptly credit 2 the settlement account of the seller. 3 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 423H.4 Penalties. 4 1. A payment card network that violates this chapter is 5 subject to a civil penalty in the amount of one thousand 6 dollars per violation. Any moneys collected pursuant to this 7 subsection shall be deposited into the general fund of the 8 state. 9 2. In lieu of an action under subsection 1, a person may 10 bring a private action to enforce this chapter, subject to 11 the same penalties as provided under subsection 1, except any 12 penalty amounts collected from the payment card network are 13 recoverable by the person bringing the private action. 14